Massachusetts, session 194th, S1493.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 6A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 16FF, as so appearing, the following new section:-
Section 16GG. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Adult”, an individual who is older than 22 years of age.
“Awaiting post-acute care disposition”, waiting not less than 72 hours to be moved from
an acute care facility to a post-acute care facility.
“Boarding”, waiting not less than 12 hours to be placed in an appropriate therapeutic
setting after: (i) being assessed; (ii) being determined in need of acute psychiatric treatment,
crisis stabilization unit placement, community-based acute treatment, intensive community-based
acute treatment, continuing care unit placement or post-hospitalization residential placement; and
of 7

(iii) receiving a determination from a licensed health care provider of medical stability without
the need for urgent medical assessment or hospitalization for a physical condition.
“Post-acute care facility”,
(b) The secretary of health and human services shall facilitate psychiatric and substance
use disorder inpatient admissions for adults seeking to be admitted from an emergency
department or hospital medical floor by developing and maintaining a confidential and secure
online portal that enables health care providers, health care facilities and payors to conduct a
real-time bed search for patient placement. The online portal shall provide real-time information
on the specific availability of all licensed psychiatric and substance use disorder inpatient beds
that shall include, but not be limited to: (i) location; (ii) care specialty; and (iii) insurance
requirements. The online portal and information contained in the online portal shall not be a
public record under clause Twenty-sixth of section 7 of chapter 4 or under chapter 66.
SECTION 2. Section 22 of chapter 6D is hereby further amended by striking paragraph
(a)(3) and replace with the following new language:-
(3) The goal of the state health resource plan shall be to promote the appropriate and
equitable distribution of health care resources across geographic regions of the commonwealth
based on the needs of the population on a statewide basis and the needs of particular geographic
and demographic groups. The recommendations shall support, at a minimum, the
commonwealth's goals of: (i) maintaining and improving the quality of and access to health care
services; (ii) ensuring a stable and adequate health care workforce; (iii) meeting the health care
cost growth benchmark established pursuant to section 9; (iv) supporting innovative health care
delivery and alternative payment models as identified by the commission; (v) avoiding
of 7

unnecessary duplication of health care resources; (vi) advancing health equity and addressing
health disparities; (vii) integrating oral health, mental health, behavioral health and substance use
disorder treatment services with overall medical care; (viii) aligning housing, health care and
home care to improve overall health outcomes and reduce costs; (ix) tracking trends in utilization
and promoting the best standards of care; (x) ensuring equitable access to health care resources
across geographic regions of the commonwealth, and (xi) informing the material cost and market
review process administered by the commission and the determination of need program
administered by the department of public health.
SECTION 3. Said section 22 of chapter 6D is hereby further amended by striking
paragraph (b)(2) and replace with the following new language:-
(2) Each focused assessment may present findings that include, but are not limited to: (i)
the extent to which supply, distribution and capacity of a given health care resource aligns with
projected need at the statewide or regional level; (ii) the extent to which supply, distribution and
capacity of a given health care resource exceeds the projected need at the statewide or regional
level; (iii) health system factors driving any documented health disparities; (iv) services or
providers, including in a specific geographic area, that are critical to the proper functioning of
the health care system; (v) estimates of where and how many additional units of service would be
needed in the state or in a specific geographic area to meet projected need; (vi) an analysis of
health care workforce needs; (vii) identification of barriers impacting accessibility of available
health care resources by specific populations; and (vii)i legislative, regulatory or other policy
recommendations to address the drivers of health disparities, access barriers and areas of
misalignment of need and supply, distribution and capacity.
of 7

SECTION 4. Section 25C of chapter 111 is hereby amended by striking paragraph (g)
and (k) and replacing them with the following new language:-
(g) The department, in making any determination of need, shall encourage appropriate
allocation of private and public health care resources and the development of alternative or
substitute methods of delivering health care services so that adequate health care services will be
made reasonably available to every person within the commonwealth at the lowest reasonable
aggregate cost, including but not limited to, availability of resources at the lowest cost setting.
The department, in making any determination of need, shall consider: (i) the state health resource
plan developed pursuant to section 22 of chapter 6D; (ii) the commonwealth’s cost containment
goals; (iii) the impacts on the applicant’s patients, including considerations of health equity, the
workforce of surrounding health care providers and on other residents of the commonwealth; and
(iv) any comments and relevant data from the center for health information and analysis, the
health policy commission including, but not limited to, any cost and market impact review report
submitted pursuant to subsection (l) of section 13 of chapter 6D and any other state agency;
provided however that the department shall not approve any application for services if the office
of health resource planning, established in section 22 of chapter 6D, has found that the existing
supply, distribution and capacity of the proposed health care resource exceeds the projected need
at the statewide or regional level where the proposed project will be sited. The department may
impose reasonable terms and conditions on the approval of a determination of need as the
department determines are necessary to achieve the purposes and intent of this section. The
department may also recognize the special needs and circumstances of projects that: (i) are
essential to the conduct of research in basic biomedical or health care delivery areas or to the
training of health care personnel; (ii) are unlikely to result in any increase in the clinical bed
of 7

capacity or outpatient load capacity of the facility; and (iii) are unlikely to cause an increase in
the total patient care charges of the facility to the public for health care services, supplies and
accommodations, as such charges shall be defined from time to time in accordance with section 5
of chapter 409 of the acts of 1976.
(k) Determinations of need shall be based on the written record compiled by the
department during its review of the application and on such criteria consistent with sections 25B
to 25G, inclusive, as were in effect on the date of filing of the application, which shall include
the report of the office of health resource planning established in section 22 of chapter 6D. In
compiling such record the department shall confine its requests for information from the
applicant to matters which shall be within the normal capacity of the applicant to provide. In
each case the action by the department on the application shall be in writing and shall set forth
the reasons for such action; and every such action and the reasons for such action shall constitute
a public record and be filed in the department.
SECTION 5. Chapter 111: Section 70I. Reduction of Duplicate Diagnostic Services
Section 70I. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following term shall have the
following meaning:
“Health insurance payer”, an individual or entity that pays for or arranges for the
purchase of health care services provided by acute hospitals, the office of Medicaid and its
contracted managed care entities and the group insurance commission.
(b) Each hospital in the Commonwealth shall file with the department, within thirty (30)
days following the start of the hospital’s fiscal year, a written plan designed to eliminate the
of 7

100 unnecessary duplication of diagnostic services performed on a patient by the hospital or health
101 system or another hospital or diagnostic facility.
102 (c) The plan shall include the following:
103 1) Procedures for sending and receiving diagnostic, imaging and other test results from or
104 to another hospital or provider of care, including the adoption of interoperable electronic health
105 records; 2) A plan to improve the hospital's ability to send and receive such test results from or to
106 other providers of care; and 3) A defined and written procedure for determining whether any
107 such test results can be appropriately used in the patient's treatment.
108 (d) The department shall notify the hospital that the plan has been approved or
109 disapproved within thirty (30) days after filing, based on a determination as to whether the plan
110 adequately addresses the issues of patient safety and costs of duplicating diagnostic tests. If such
111 a hospital’s plan has not been acted upon by the department within forty-five (45) days, the plan
112 shall be deemed approved.
113 (e) The department shall approve any plan that it determines is reasonably likely to
114 eliminate unnecessary duplicate diagnostic services and has a reasonable expectation for
115 successful implementation.
116 (f) If the department determines that a hospital’s plan is unacceptable or incomplete, the
117 department shall disapprove of a hospital’s plan and require the hospital to submit a revised plan
118 within thirty (30) days and may recommend specific elements for approval. If the revised plan
119 continues to be disapproved, or if a hospital fails to submit a plan, the commissioner may issue
120 an order that such a plan be submitted immediately, or the hospital may be subject to penalties
121 pursuant to subsection (f).
of 7

122 (g) If the department determines that a hospital has: (i) willfully neglected to file a plan
123 with the department subsection (e); (ii) failed to file an acceptable plan in good faith with the
124 department; (iii) failed to implement the plan in good faith; or (iv) knowingly failed to provide
125 information required by this section to the department, the department may assess a civil penalty
126 to the hospital of not more than $500,000.
127 (h) Health insurance payers may deny payment for any duplicate services furnished
128 unless the hospital can establish that the duplicate service was medically necessary and
129 appropriate. In the event that a health insurance payer denies payment for duplicate services, the
130 hospital may not balance bill the insured for those services.
131 (i) The department shall promulgate regulations implementing this section, which shall
132 include standards for determining whether a diagnostic service shall be considered a duplication
133 of a previous diagnostic service.
134 SECTION 6. Section 51 of chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
135 inserting after paragraph eleven, the following new paragraph:-
136 “The department shall require all licensed facilities to operate on 24 hours a day, 7 days a
137 week basis for admissions and discharges.”
of 7